Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 7 Building and Loan Associations and Savings and Loan Associations

Cross references.

Authority of building and loan associations and savings and loan associations to invest in projects involving redevelopment of blighted areas, §

8-4-12

.

Appointment of building and loan associations and federal savings and loan associations as state depositories of state funds, §

50-17-50

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Building and loan associations generally, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-4-1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Small Loans Under Georgia Laws,” see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 227 (1952).

For article discussing the consolidation of laws dealing with various types of financial organizations into the Financial Institutions Code of Georgia, see 11 Ga. St. B.J. 225 (1975).

7-1-770.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

An association is “local” if the greater portion of its investment in real estate loans is limited to loans on the security of a first lien or security title on real estate. Any such association may purchase real estate loans or interests in real estate loans which are made and owned by any savings and loan association to the extent authorized by the regulations of the department, provided that such regulations shall not permit the purchase of loans or interests in loans of any type or in any amounts (per individual loan or in the aggregate) which are not permitted by law to be purchased by savings and loan associations with principal offices in this state.

An association is “mutual” if all depositors in such association participate in the income of such association and if all borrowers are privileged to vote at least one vote at any meeting of members, it being unnecessary that any borrower should subscribe to or purchase any shares or be entitled to participate in any way in the income of such association.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 2; Ga. L. 1945, p. 263, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 473, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3501, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 16; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-15/HB 811.

7-1-771.
[Reserved] Members of building and loan association; voting.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 263, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3502, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-772.
[Reserved] Presentation, contents, and execution of articles of building and loan association.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-773.
[Reserved] Approval or disapproval of articles of building and loan association by department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 533, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3504, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 27, effective July 1, 1989.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 27 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1989.

7-1-774.
[Reserved] Approval of articles of building and loan association; renewals or amendments to existing charters.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 533, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3505, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 41; repealed by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 28, effective July 1, 1989.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 28 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1989.

7-1-775.
[Reserved] Filing and processing articles of incorporation and amendments for building and loan association.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 41; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 29; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-776.
[Reserved] Certificate of incorporation or amendment issued by Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 30; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-777.
Principal and branch offices.

No savings and loan association or similar corporation existing under the laws of this state or of the United States shall accept deposits in this state except on the premises of an established principal office or branch office operated pursuant to this article. For the purposes of this Code section, the term “branch office” shall be construed to mean any office of such association or corporation which is intended to be permanently established in a fixed location and to be operated at such location on substantially a full-time basis.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 653, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3508, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-778.
[Reserved] Rules and regulations governing building and loan associations.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-3509, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-779.
Use of “savings and loan” or other terms likely to mislead public as to nature of business.

No person or corporation, except a savings and loan association actually engaged in carrying on a savings and loan business as contemplated by this article or the laws of the United States, shall transact business under any name or title which contains the term “savings and loan” or combination of the words used in said phrase or use any sign or any letterhead or billhead, circular, or paper of any kind or advertise in any manner which indicates that his or its business is the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by a savings and loan association or which is likely to lead the public to believe that his or its business is that of a savings and loan association.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 10; Code 1933, § 41A-3510, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323.

Cross references.

Regulations pertaining to use of names by financial institutions generally, §

7-1-130

.

7-1-780.
Lien on deposits to secure loans.

To secure loans, savings and loan associations shall have a lien without further agreement or pledge upon all deposits with it by a borrower; and, upon default upon any loan, any such association may, without notice to or consent of the borrower, cancel on its books part or all of the amount outstanding to the credit of the borrower not exceeding his obligations to the association and apply such amount in payment of the obligations.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 11; Code 1933, § 41A-3511, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-781.
Conversion into savings and loan association.

Any other financial institution existing under the laws of this state doing a home financing business may convert itself into a savings and loan association in accordance with Section 5 of the Home Owners’ Loan Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1464, upon a vote of 51 percent or more of the votes of the members cast at an annual meeting or at any special meeting called to consider such action.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 12; Code 1933, § 41A-3512, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-17/HB 811.

7-1-782.
[Reserved] Effect of conversion into savings and loan association.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 12; Code 1933, § 41A-3513, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-783.
Previous conversions into savings and loan associations ratified.

Any corporation which has converted itself prior to April 1, 1975, into a savings and loan association under the Home Owners’ Loan Act and has received a charter from the Federal Home Loan Bank Board shall be recognized as a savings and loan association, and its federal charter shall be given full credence by the courts of this state to the same extent as if such conversion had taken place under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 12; Code 1933, § 41A-3514, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-18/HB 811.

U.S. Code.

The Home Owners’ Loan Act of 1933, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

12 U.S.C. § 1461

et seq.

7-1-784.
[Reserved] Conversion into building and loan association.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 12; Code 1933, § 41A-3515, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-785.
[Reserved] Effect of conversion into building and loan association.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 12; Code 1933, § 41A-3516, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-786.
Taxation.

No savings and loan association with a home office in this state shall be assessed or subjected to taxation by the state or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision taxing authority on its franchise, capital, reserves, surplus, loans, shares, or accounts; except that any real property and any tangible personal property not hereinbefore specifically mentioned, which may be owned by it, shall be subject to taxation to the same extent, according to its value, as all other real and tangible personal property is taxed.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 13; Code 1933, § 41A-3517, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-787.
Exemption from securities regulations.

The opening and transfer of deposits in a savings and loan association are exempted from all provisions of law of this state which provide for the supervision and the regulation of the sale of securities, even if the word “shares” or similar terminology is used in connection therewith; and the sale of any such deposits shall be legal without any action or approval whatsoever on the part of any official authorized to license, regulate, and supervise the sale of securities.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 14; Code 1933, § 41A-3518, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

Cross references.

Exemption from securities-registration requirements of securities issued by federal savings and loan associations, or building and loan associations, § 10-5-8.

7-1-788.
Notaries and other officers not disqualified by interest in association; validation of prior instruments.

No notary public or other public officer shall be disqualified from taking the acknowledgment of or witnessing any instrument, in writing, in which a savings and loan association is interested, by reason of his holding an office in or being a member of or being pecuniarily interested in or employed by such association so interested; and any such acknowledgments or attestations taken prior to April 1, 1975, are validated.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 15; Code 1933, § 41A-3519, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-789.
Minors’ deposits, safe-deposit boxes, and third-party payment accounts; validity of releases.

A minor shall be allowed to have deposits in a savings and loan association in his own name, and the deposits made by the minor shall not be subject to the control of his parent, guardian, or trustee. A minor may have third-party payment accounts. A receipt or acquittance signed by such a minor depositor shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of such association for any payment of any deposit to such minor. In the transactions involving payments to third parties out of the minor’s account, the payment of an order of the minor shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the savings and loan association for any payment of such funds from the minor’s account.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to include, without limitation:

Deposits in such associations by a minor with one or more adults or other minors, as party to and with the same effect as a multiple-party account under Article 8 of this chapter;

The rental to a minor by said associations of a safe-deposit box or other receptacle for the safe deposit of property from such minor (and the receipt of any such property), individually or jointly with one or more adults; and

The dealing with a minor by said associations with respect to such a deposit account, third-party payment account, or safe-deposit agreement without the consent of a parent or guardian and with the same effect as though the minor were an adult.

Any action of the minor with respect to such deposit account, third-party payment account, or safe-deposit agreement shall be binding on the minor with the same effect as though the minor were an adult.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 16; Code 1933, § 41A-3520, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 17; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1085, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-790.
Deposits of fiduciaries.

A savings and loan association may receive deposits in the name of an administrator, executor, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary in trust for a named or an unnamed beneficiary or beneficiaries. Such a deposit and dividends or interest thereon or other rights relating thereto may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to such fiduciary or may be exercised by such fiduciary without regard to any notice to the contrary so long as such fiduciary is living and until the association has received notice of the death of such fiduciary. The payment or delivery to any such fiduciary or a receipt or acquittance signed by any such fiduciary, to whom any such payment or any such delivery of rights is made, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of such association for the payment or delivery so made.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 16; Code 1933, § 41A-3522, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, “a” was deleted preceding “savings and loan association” in the first sentence.

7-1-791.
Payment on death of depositor.

Except as provided in Article 8 of this chapter, upon the death of a depositor of a savings and loan association, such association may pay the amount of his deposit or any portion thereof to an executor, administrator, or other fiduciary duly appointed and qualified pursuant to the last will and testament of the depositor or by any court of competent jurisdiction in this state or any other state.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 16; Ga. L. 1958, p. 620, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3523, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 43; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1388, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 661, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

Cross references.

Payment of deposits of deceased depositors, §

7-1-239

.

7-1-792.
Deposits applied to funeral expenses.

Except as provided in Article 8 of this chapter, if no application for the deposit is made by any person named in Code Section 7-1-791 within 90 days from the death of a depositor, a savings and loan association shall be authorized to apply not more than $1,000.00 of the deposit of such deceased depositor in payment of the funeral expenses of such deceased depositor upon receipt of an itemized statement of such expenses and the affidavit of the undertaker conducting the funeral that said statement was true and correct and had not been paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 16; Code 1933, § 41A-3524, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1388, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-793.
Investment of funds in insured deposits.

Administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries of every kind and nature; insurance companies; charitable, educational, eleemosynary, and public corporations and organizations; municipalities and other public corporations and bodies; and public officials are authorized to invest funds held by them, without any order of any court, in deposits in savings and loan associations which are insured under a federal deposit insurance program; and, to the extent of such insurance, such investments shall be deemed and held to be legal investments for such funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 322, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 756, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 305, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 194, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3525, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, “associations or” was deleted preceding “savings and loan associations” in the middle of this Code section.

7-1-794.
Deposits as security or in lieu of bond.

Whenever, under the laws of this state or otherwise, a deposit of securities is required for any purpose, the deposits made legal investments by Code Section 7-1-793 shall be acceptable as such security; and, whenever, under the law of this state or otherwise, a bond is required with security, such bond may be furnished and the deposits made legal investments by Code Section 7-1-793 in the amount of such bond shall be acceptable to secure said bond without other security. This Code section and Code Section 7-1-793 are supplemental to any and all other laws relating to and declaring what shall be legal investments for the persons, corporations, organizations, and officials referred to in these Code sections and the laws relating to the deposit of securities and the making and filing of bonds for any purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 322, § 2; Ga. L. 1952, p. 305, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 194, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-3526, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-795.
Savings account books and certificates.

The original record of deposits in savings and loan associations is the record on the books of the association, and the depositor shall be entitled to a savings account book or certificate which is a duplicate of such record. Those dealing with such savings account books and certificates shall be bound by the record on the books of the association. In the event of the loss or destruction of any such savings account book or certificate, any association may, upon receipt of an affidavit of such loss or destruction, issue a duplicate thereof and remain liable only to the holder or holders as shown on the records of the association. The only way an effective transfer or pledge may be accomplished so as to affect the rights of the association is by transfer on the books of the association in the case of transfer or written notice of a pledge entered on the books of the association and acknowledged in writing in the case of a pledge; and the association shall be protected in paying any part of a deposit to the holder thereof as shown on the books of the association unless it has received written notice of a pledge or transfer thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 16-439, enacted by Ga. L. 1952, p. 305, § 4; Code 1933, § 41A-3527, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-796.
Insanity, incompetency, bankruptcy, or death of depositor.

A savings and loan association paying deposits to an insane or otherwise incompetent depositor or bankrupt depositor or acting upon the release and discharge or authorization of such depositor or acting upon the power of attorney of an insane, deceased, or bankrupt depositor in good faith and without actual knowledge of the insanity or other incompetency, bankruptcy, or death of such depositor shall be protected in so doing and may lawfully charge such payment to the depositor’s account.

History.

Code 1933, § 16-440, enacted by Ga. L. 1956, p. 628, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3528, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, “a” was deleted preceding “savings and loan association” at the beginning of this Code section.

7-1-797.
[Repealed] Building and loan association deposit insurance requirements; public notices when deposits not properly insured.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3529, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 9; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-16/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7(10)/HB 323, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of this Code section.